Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 29

Tennessee Minority Business Councils Cooperation Act of 1997

13-29-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Minority Business Councils Cooperation Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 404, § 1.

13-29-102. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds the following:

Minority business councils have been created to serve, support and promote minority business interests and minority-owned business entities in Tennessee urban communities;

Such councils have enhanced the ability of minority business to procure employment opportunities in each council's respective community; and

At present, each council has independent and often duplicative certification procedures and no reciprocity provisions exist between the various councils.

Acts 1997, ch. 404, § 2.

13-29-103. Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to create one (1) central certification process that would permit reciprocity of certification for minority businesses throughout Tennessee.

Acts 1997, ch. 404, § 2.

13-29-104. Cooperation by minority business councils.

Minority business councils doing business in Tennessee shall promulgate uniform certification procedures for member businesses, shall charge uniform fees for such services, and shall permit reciprocity of certification among the individual minority business councils. Such councils shall bear all costs of implementing this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 404, § 3.